CIK: 350907
Company Name: THORATEC CORP
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2015-02-19
Accession Number: 0001047469-15-000962


Item 1 Business OVERVIEW Thoratec Corporation ("we," "our," "us," or the "Company") is a world leader in mechanical circulatory support with a product portfolio to treat the full range of clinical needs for advanced heart failure patients. We develop, manufacture and market proprietary medical devices used for circulatory support. Heart failure is a chronic disease that occurs when degeneration of the heart muscle reduces the pumping power of the heart, causing the heart to become too weak to pump blood at a level sufficient to meet the body's demands. THE COMPANY AND BACKGROUND Incorporated in the State of California in 1976, Thoratec Corporation trades on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under the ticker symbol THOR and is headquartered in Pleasanton, California. Our principal executive offices are located at 6035 St1ridge Drive, Pleasanton, California, 94588. The teleph1 number at that address is (925) 847 8600. We make available, free of charge on our website located at www.thoratec.com, our annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, and any amendments to those reports, as soon as reasonably practicable after filing such reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Our code of ethics, corporate governance guidelines, company compliance program, audit committee charter, corporate governance and nominating committee charter, compensation committee charter, and audit committee complaint procedures are also posted on our website and are each available in print to any shareholder upon request by writing to Thoratec Corporation, Investor Relations, 6035 St1ridge Drive, Pleasanton, California, 94588. The contents of our website are not incorporated by reference into this report. OUR PRODUCTS We develop, manufacture and market proprietary medical devices used for mechanical circulatory support ("MCS") for the treatment of heart failure ("HF") patients. For chronic circulatory support for HF patients, our primary product lines are our ventricular assist devices ("VADs") HeartMate II Left Ventricular Assist System ("HeartMate II"), HeartMate III Left Ventricular Assist System ("HeartMate III"), Thoratec Paracorporeal Ventricular Assist Device ("PVAD"), and Thoratec Implantable Ventricular Assist Device ("IVAD"). We refer to HeartMate II and HeartMate III collectively as the "HeartMate product line" and PVAD and IVAD collectively as the "Thoratec product line." For acute circulatory support, our product lines are CentriMag Acute Circulatory System ("CentriMag") and for pediatric patients PediMag PediVAS Acute Circulatory System ("PediMag PediVAS"). HeartMate II, PVAD, IVAD, CentriMag and PediMag PediVAS are approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA"), and have received Conformit Europ ene ("CE") Mark approval in Europe. MCS devices supplement the pumping function of the heart in patients with HF. In most cases, a cannula connects the left ventricle of the heart to a blood pump. Blood flows from the left ventricle to the pump chamber via the cannula, powered by an electric or air driven mechanism that drives the blood through another cannula into the aorta. From the aorta, the blood then circulates throughout the body. Mechanical or tissue valves enable unidirectional flow in some devices. Currently, the power source remains outside the body for all FDA approved MCS devices. Some of our devices can also provide support for the right side of the heart. 3 Table of Contents HeartMate III, a centrifugal flow, chronic, left ventricular assist system, is currently in U.S. Investigational Device Exemption ("IDE") and Conformit Europ ene Mark clinical trials and has not yet been approved for commercial sales. The HeartMate III U.S. clinical trial is a randomized non inferiority study comparing HeartMate III with HeartMate II and includes a primary endpoint of survival free of device replacement and debilitating stroke. In 2014, the trial began enrollment in a safety phase under conditional approval from the FDA for 30 patients at five sites. Enrollment is planned to broaden to up to 60 sites following full approval from the FDA based on 30 day follow up data from the initial safety phase. The trial provides that the first 294 randomized patients will be followed for six months to evaluate a short term indication such as Bridge to Transplantation. The first 366 randomized patients will be followed for 24 months to evaluate a long term indication such as Destination Therapy. The trial also allows for approximately 600 additional randomized patients to be enrolled beyond the pivotal cohort in order to assess secondary endpoints. In 2014, fifty patients were enrolled in the CE Mark trial at ten locations in Europe, Central Asia, Canada and Australia. The CE Mark trial will evaluate patient survival with a six month follow up period, which will be reached in May 2015. HeartMate III, which incorporates a fully magnetically levitated technology foundation, is designed to lower adverse event rates through improved hemocompatibility and to enhance the ease of surgical placement through a compact size. Our product portfolio of commercially approved implantable and external MCS devices is described below. HeartMate II HeartMate II is an implantable, electrically powered, continuous flow, left ventricular assist device ("LVAD") consisting of a rotary blood pump designed to provide intermediate and long term MCS. HeartMate II is designed to improve survival and quality of life for a broad range of advanced HF patients. Significantly smaller than our previous generation device and with only 1 moving part, HeartMate II is simpler and designed to operate more quietly than pulsatile devices. HeartMate II received FDA approval in April 2008 for bridge to transplantation ("BTT") and received FDA approval for use in HF patients who are not eligible for heart transplantation ("Destination Therapy" or "DT") in January 2010. In November 2005, we completed the required conformity assessment procedure and design dossier reviews to be given authority from our Notified Body to affix the CE Mark to the HeartMate II for marketing in Europe. HeartMate II is the world's most widely used LVAD. CentriMag The CentriMag is an extracorporeal circulatory support device that provides hemodynamic stabilization in patients in need of cardiopulmonary support. The CentriMag Pump is electronically driven, centrifugal pump based on bearingless motor technology. CentriMag is cleared by the FDA for use up to six hours in patients requiring short term extracorporeal circulatory support during cardiac surgery. Additionally, CentriMag is approved under an FDA humanitarian device exemption ("HDE") to be used as a right ventricular assist device for periods of support up to thirty days in patients in cardiogenic shock due to acute right ventricular failure. The device is marketed in Europe to provide support for up to thirty days for both cardiac and respiratory failure. PediMag PediVAS PediMag and PediVAS are identical, extracorporeal full flow acute surgical support platforms incorporating a polycarbonate pump, based on magnetically levitated bearingless motor technology, designed to provide acute surgical support to pediatric patients. The brand names differ according to indication for use, duration of support, and regulatory approval. PediMag is cleared by the FDA for use, in conjunction with the CentriMag console and motor, for support periods of up to six hours. Outside the U.S., the device is branded as PediVAS. This device has been CE Marked for marketing in Europe to provide support for up to 30 days for both cardiac and respiratory failure. 4 Table of Contents PVAD PVAD is an external, pulsatile VAD, FDA approved for BTT and post cardiotomy myocardial recovery. PVAD is a paracorporeal device that is less invasive than implantable VADs since only the cannula are implanted. The paracorporeal nature of PVAD provides several benefits including shorter implantation times and the ability to use the device in smaller patients. PVAD is designed for short to intermediate duration for post cardiotomy myocardial recovery following cardiac surgery and BTT. PVAD and IVAD, described below, offer left, right or biventricular support for use for BTT. This characteristic is significant because the vast majority of BTT patients treated with PVAD and IVAD require right as well as left side ventricular assistance. PVAD and IVAD are also the only devices approved for both BTT and recovery following cardiac surgery. PVAD incorporates our proprietary biomaterial, Thoralon, which has high tissue and blood compatibility and is resistant to blood clots. PVAD received FDA approval for BTT in December 1995 and for recovery (post cardiotomy) in May 1998. In June 1998, we completed the required conformity assessment procedure and design dossier reviews to be given authority from our Notified Body to affix the CE Mark to the PVAD, allowing for its commercial sale in Europe. IVAD IVAD is an implantable, pulsatile, VAD, FDA approved for BTT, including home discharge, and post cardiotomy myocardial recovery and provides left, right or biventricular MCS. IVAD maintains the same blood flow path, valves and blood pumping mechanism as PVAD, but has an outer housing made of a titanium alloy that makes it suitable for implantation. IVAD received FDA approval for BTT and recovery (post cardiotomy) in August 2004. In June 2003, we completed the required conformity assessment procedure and design dossier reviews to be given authority from our Notified Body to affix the CE Mark to the IVAD, allowing for its commercial sale in Europe. PRODUCT SEGMENTS We have 1 operating segment (Cardiovascular group). This segment is organized and operates to develop and manufacture mechanical circulatory products to support the cardiovascular systems of humans and to provide product related services. Information concerning revenues is set forth in Note 13 in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, contained in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. OUR MARKETS Our VAD products primarily serve patients suffering from late stage HF. HF is a chronic disease that occurs when degeneration of the heart muscle reduces the pumping power of the heart, causing the heart to become too weak to pump blood at a level sufficient to meet the body's demands. The condition can be caused by arterial and valvular diseases or a cardiomyopathy, which is a disease of the heart muscle itself. Other conditions, such as high blood pressure or diabetes, also can lead to HF. According to estimates by the American Heart Association, 6.6 million people suffer from HF in the U.S. and approximately 600,000 new cases are diagnosed each year. While the number of treatment options for earlier stage HF has increased in recent years, pharmacologic therapies remain the most widely used approach for treatment of HF. These drug therapies include angiotensin converting enzyme ("ACE") inhibitors, anti coagulants and beta blockers, which facilitate blood flow, thin the blood or help the heart work in a more efficient manner. In addition to the use of VADs, other procedures addressing HF include angioplasty, biventricular pacing, valve replacement, bypass and left ventricular reduction surgery. 5 Table of Contents Despite attempts to manage HF through drug therapy, the only curative treatment for late stages of the disease is heart transplantation. The number of donor hearts available each year can meet the needs of only a small number of patients who could benefit from transplantation. The United Ne2rk for Organ Sharing reported that approximately 2,200 hearts became available for transplant in the U.S. during the twelve months reported to December 2014, the most recent period for which data is available. At January 31, 2015, approximately 4,000 patients were on the U.S. national transplant waiting list, and we believe a comparable number of patients are currently waiting in Europe. The median wait time for a donor heart is approximately nine months; many patients have to wait as long as 2 years. In the U.S., there are currently 2 FDA approved indications for the long term use of VADs in patients with HF for DT and as a BTT. In addition to the chronic HF markets, MCS devices are also approved for use for acute HF following and during cardiac surgery. All four indications are summarized below. Destination Therapy On January 20, 2010, we received approval to market HeartMate II for DT in patients with New York Heart Association Class III B and IV end stage left ventricular failure who have received optimal medical therapy for at least 45 of the last 60 days, and who are not candidates for cardiac transplantation. In 2012, we completed the FDA required post market study of 247 patients who received the HeartMate II for DT. The HeartMate II is the only device that is FDA approved and commercially marketed in the U.S. for DT support in adults. The National Institute for Health estimated that the DT application represents a market opportunity of 50,000 to 100,000 patients in the U.S. For these late stage HF patients, drug therapy is currently the only other treatment available. With drug therapy, the 2 year survival rate for these patients is approximately 8%. We believe that the success in transitioning this market from maximum drug therapy to VADs is partially dependent on the development of the market for our HeartMate product line. Bridge to Transplantation VADs provide additional cardiac support for patients with late stage HF waiting for a donor heart. Approximately 40% to 50% of the patients on the waiting list for a heart transplant in the U.S. receive a VAD. We believe that the percentage of BTT patients will continue to increase as surgeons' level of comfort with the technology increases, particularly for longer term support cases. We currently have 2 devices that are FDA approved and commercially marketed in the U.S. for BTT support in adults. Post Cardiotomy Myocardial Recovery Following Cardiac Surgery In addition to chronic HF, our devices are also used for patients who suffer from acute cardiac failure after undergoing cardiac surgery. Some patients have difficulty being weaned off heart lung machines after surgery, a complication that arises in open heart procedures. Many of these patients ultimately die from HF when the heart, weakened by disease and the additional trauma of surgery, fails to maintain adequate blood circulation. We believe that only a small portion of this market is currently being treated with VADs and that this patient population could benefit substantially from the use of our FDA approved PVAD and IVAD products. Cardiac Surgery Support In addition to the longer term mechanical circulatory support indications, the CentriMag is approved to provide MCS for periods appropriate to cardiopulmonary bypass and for circulatory support when complete cardiopulmonary bypass is not necessary, for example during valvuloplasty, mitral valve reoperation, surgery of the vena cava or aorta, or liver transplants. 6 Table of Contents OUR STRATEGY Our strategy is to maintain and expand our leadership position through execution of the following market and product development initiatives Expand the utilization of MCS therapy worldwide in patients with advanced heart failure. Focus on and partner with leading heart centers. We have developed long standing relationships with leading cardiovascular surgeons, heart failure cardiologists and heart centers worldwide. These relationships are an important part of our growth strategy, particularly for the development and introduction of new products and the pursuit of additional indications for our existing products. We continue our investment in building these relationships through cardiology education outreach programs. Our Market Development Managers work in partnership with our VAD centers to increase the awareness of MCS therapy in the cardiology community. Clinician education and outreach. We continue to expand awareness of MCS through education and outreach programs, both at implanting centers and within the referring cardiology community. We are building upon our existing relationships with cardiac surgeons and heart failure cardiologists in both transplant and open heart centers and using our existing sales channels to gain acceptance and adoption of our products in the major hospitals that perform open heart surgery. Additionally, we are educating community cardiologists and other potential referring clinicians about the benefits of MCS through our team of approximately 40 Market Development Managers in the U.S. as well as through clinical symposia, on line education programs, and other outreach efforts. Center expansion. We ended 2014 with 396 HeartMate II centers globally, including 180 centers in the U.S. and 216 centers internationally, an increase of 31 centers during the year. In addition, there are now 136 U.S. centers with Joint Commission certification for reimbursement for DT. Geographic expansion. We are focused on increased worldwide adoption of MCS by developing MCS therapy in important emerging markets through obtaining regulatory approval, developing centers of excellence, and increasing awareness. Patient education and awareness. We also continue to expand awareness and education for patients and their care givers about the benefits of MCS therapy that include improved survival and quality of life. Offer a broad range of products. We currently offer the widest range of MCS devices to cover indications for use ranging from acute to long term support. We believe that the breadth of our product offering represents an important competitive advantage because it allows us to address the various preferences of clinicians, the needs of a wide variety of patients, and the economic requirements of third party payors. We intend to further broaden our product line through internal development, acquisition and licensing. Develop and obtain approval for new products and new indications for our products. Our product pipeline includes new technologies to augment the performance and ease of use of the HeartMate II system as well as next generation pump platforms. As part of our ongoing evolution of the HeartMate product line, in 2009 we launched our external peripherals, Go Gear, including new batteries, charger and power module. These external peripherals improve quality of life of patients by offering them additional freedom and mobility. We launched sealed inflow and outflow grafts for HeartMate II in 2011, which improved ease of implant. In 2013, we launched the Pocket Controller for the HeartMate II system. The Pocket Controller is designed to be smaller, lighter, and easier to use than previous controllers, and it incorporates a backup battery for enhanced patient safety. 7 Table of Contents We also continue to invest in next generation pump platforms, including HeartMate III, HeartMate PHP, and DuraHeart II. HeartMate III is a fully magnetically levitated, centrifugal, continuous flow pump. The full magnetic levitation allows for wide blood gaps and pulsatility, which we believe will result in a lower rate of adverse events. We are also developing the HeartMate PHP, which is a catheter based axial flow heart pump for application in an unstable HF patient population. The device features a collapsible elastomeric impeller and nitinol cannula that expand to nearly double its size upon insertion. HeartMate PHP is designed to deliver four to five liters per minute of average blood flow. DuraHeart II is an ultra compact, full support, centrifugal flow chronic ventricular assist system that is designed to use a unique technology foundation known as "force balance" suspension. DuraHeart II is designed to use magnetic forces, balanced by hydrodynamic support, to achieve consistent gaps across the operating range of the pump, independent of pump speed. Increase the cost effectiveness of the therapies that employ our products. While Medicare data indicates the cost of implanting a VAD for Destination Therapy is tracking similarly to that of a heart, liver or other major organ transplant, cost remains a concern for our customers. We work closely with VAD centers to continue to improve patient selection, reduce adverse events, and enhance the efficiency of follow up care, which we believe will ultimately improve the cost effectiveness of this therapy. We also are expanding our market education and training programs, and will continue to make improvements that enhance the performance and cost effectiveness of our products. Increase our market presence through strategic alliances, joint ventures and acquisitions. In addition to increasing our presence in heart failure and other cardiovascular disease markets through internal growth, we continue to evaluate strategic alliances, joint ventures, acquisitions and related business development opportunities. For instance, we acquired the intellectual property assets of HeartMate PHP from Getinge AB in 2010, Levitronix Medical in 2011, DuraHeart II from Terumo Corporation in 2013, and Apica Cardiovascular Limited in 2014. SALES AND MARKETING We recruit and train experienced cardiovascular sales specialists who sell our circulatory support systems throughout the world. Our sales force is complemented by direct clinical specialists and market development managers. The clinical specialists conduct clinical educational seminars, assist with VAD implants and resolve clinical questions or issues. Our sales and marketing initiatives include education seminars, symposia, journal advertisements, and direct consumer marketing, all common initiatives in the cardiovascular device market. We partner with universities, experienced clinicians and opinion leaders to assist with expanding clinical educational needs. Our market development managers work with our leading VAD centers to generate referrals through increasing awareness in the cardiology community regarding MCS. In addition to our direct selling efforts, we have a ne2rk of international distributors who cover other geographic markets. The time from the initial contact with the cardiac surgeon until purchase is generally between nine and eighteen months, due to the expense of the product and common hospital capital equipment acquisition procedures. The introduction of a VAD system in a hospital or other medical facility requires that the surgical and clinical support personnel possess certain product expertise. We provide initial training and "best practice" instruction for these personnel, along with a variety of training materials that accompany the initial delivery of our VAD products, including instructions for use, patient management manuals and assorted videos. We provide clinical support during implants and provide twenty four hour access to clinically trained personnel. In addition, our health economic team helps customers understand and manage reimbursement from third party payors. We believe that these VAD related services are an important part of the value that we provide to hospitals and patients. 8 Table of Contents COMPETITION Competition from medical device companies and medical device divisions of healthcare companies, pharmaceutical companies and gene and cell based therapies is intense and is expected to increase. The vast majority of VAD eligible patients still receive pharmacological treatment instead of a VAD. We therefore continue to expect new competitors both from the pharmacological and the medical device space. Among the medical device competitors are Aachen Innovative Solutions GmbH, AbioMed, Inc., Berlin Heart GmbH, HeartWare International Inc., Jarvik Heart, Inc., Maquet Cardiovascular, LLC (a division of Getinge AB), ReliantHeart, Inc., Sun Medical Technology Research Corporation, SynCardia Systems, Inc., and Terumo Heart, Inc. We believe that key competitive factors include the relative speed with which we can develop products, complete clinical testing, receive regulatory approvals, achieve market acceptance, provide high quality, ongoing support, and manufacture and sell commercial quantities of our products. PATENTS AND PROPRIETARY RIGHTS We seek to protect our technology and intellectual property rights through obtaining and maintaining patent, trademark, copyright and trade secret protection. We own, or have exclusive rights to, various U.S. and foreign patents. U.S. patents are typically granted for a term of about 20 years from the date a patent application is filed. The remaining durations on our patents range from less than 1 year to up to 20 years. The actual protection afforded by a foreign patent, which can vary from country to country, depends upon the type of patent, the scope of its coverage and the availability of legal remedies in the country. In those instances where we have acquired technology from third parties, we have sought to obtain rights to the technology through the acquisition of underlying patents or licenses. Our patents and patent applications relate to a number of important aspects of our technology. We intend to continue to file additional patent applications both in the U.S. and in foreign jurisdictions to seek protection for our technology. We have developed technical knowledge that, although non patentable, we consider significant to our competitive position. It is our policy to enter into confidentiality agreements with each of our employees and consultants prohibiting the disclosure of any confidential information or trade secrets. In addition, these agreements provide that any inventions or discoveries by employees and consultants relating to our business will be assigned to us and become our sole property. While we believe design, development, clinical performance and regulatory aspects of the medical device business represent the principal barriers to entry, we also recognize that our patents and license rights may make it more difficult for others to market products similar to those we manufacture and market. Despite our patents, license rights and policies with regard to confidential information, trade secrets and inventions, we may be subject to challenges to the validity of our patents, claims that our products allegedly infringe the patent rights of others and the disclosure of our confidential information or trade secrets. These and other related risks are described more fully under the heading " Our inability to protect our proprietary technologies or an infringement of others' patents could harm our competitive position " in the "Risk Factors" section of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. At this time, we are not a party to any material legal proceedings that relate to patents or proprietary rights. 9 Table of Contents GOVERNMENT REGULATIONS Regulation by governmental authorities in the U.S. and foreign countries is a significant factor in the manufacture and marketing of our current and future products and in our ongoing product research and development activities. All of our proposed products will require regulatory approval prior to commercialization. In particular, medical devices are subject to rigorous clinical testing as a condition of approval by the FDA and by similar authorities in foreign countries. FDA Regulations In the U.S., the FDA regulates the design, manufacture, distribution and promotion of medical devices pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended ("FDCA"), and its regulations. Our mechanical circulatory support ("MCS") systems are regulated as medical devices. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to commercially distribute in the United States will require either prior 510(k) clearance or prior approval of a premarket approval ("PMA") application from the FDA. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes. Devices deemed to pose lower risk are placed in either class I or II, which requires the manufacturer to submit to the FDA a pre market notification requesting permission for commercial distribution. This process is known as 510(k) clearance. Some low risk devices are exempt from this requirement. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, or devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device are placed in class III, requiring approval of a PMA application. To market MCS systems similar to those under development, the FDA requires approval of a PMA. A PMA application must be supported by extensive data including, but not limited to, technical information regarding device design and development, preclinical and clinical trials, data and manufacturing and labeling to support the FDA's determination that the device is safe and effective for its intended use. After a PMA application is complete, the FDA begins an in depth review of the submitted information, which generally takes between 1 and 3 years, but may take significantly longer. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, the FDA will conduct a preapproval inspection of the manufacturing facility to ensure compliance with Quality System Regulation, or QSR, which imposes elaborate design, development, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures in the design and manufacturing process. New PMA applications or PMA application supplements are required for significant modifications to the manufacturing process, labeling and design of a device that is approved through the PMA process. PMA supplements often require submission of the same type of information as a PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA application, and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. Under the FDA's requirements, to obtain 510(k) clearance, a manufacturer must submit a premarket notification demonstrating that a newly developed device is "substantially equivalent" to a previously cleared 510(k) device or a device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which the FDA has not yet called for the submission of PMA applications. The FDA's 510(k) clearance pathway usually takes from 3 to 12 months from the date the application is completed, but it can take significantly longer and clearance is never assured. Although many 510(k) pre market notifications are cleared without clinical data, in some cases, the FDA requires significant clinical data to support substantial equivalence. If substantial equivalence cannot be established, or if the FDA determines that the device should be subjected to a more rigorous review, the FDA will require that the manufacturer submit a PMA application that must be approved by the FDA prior to marketing the device in the U.S. 10 Table of Contents A clinical trial is almost always required to support a PMA application and may be required for a 510(k) premarket notification. These trials generally require submission of an application for an Investigational Device Exemption ("IDE"). An IDE application must contain pre clinical test data supporting the safety of the product for human investigational use, information on manufacturing processes and procedures, proposed clinical protocols and other information. If the IDE application is accepted and approval is obtained from the responsible institutional review boards, human clinical trials may begin. The IDE application must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of subjects, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for more abbreviated IDE requirements. Clinical trials must be conducted in compliance with FDA regulations and are subject to central registration requirements on www.clinicaltrials.gov (n1 of the information available at this website is, or should be deemed to be, incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10 K). The results obtained from these trials, if satisfactory, are accumulated and submitted to the FDA in support of a PMA, a PMA Supplement or a 510(k) premarket notification. Both a 510(k) premarket notification, if cleared, and a PMA application, if approved, may include significant limitations on the indicated uses for which a product may be marketed. FDA prohibits the promotion of cleared or approved medical devices for uses that are not cleared or approved. In addition, approved devices such as MCS devices may be subject to requirements for post market approval studies which can be lengthy and costly to the manufacturer. Medical device clearances and approvals can be withdrawn for failure to comply with regulatory requirements or the occurrence of unforeseen problems following initial marketing. Both 510(k) pre market notifications and PMA applications and supplements are subject to the payment of substantial user fees, paid at the time of submission for FDA review. Most recently, the Food and Drug Administration Safety and Innovation Act (FDASIA), signed into law on July 9, 2012, reauthorized medical device user fees for fiscal years 2013 2017 and enacted several "Medical Device Regulatory Improvements" and miscellaneous reforms which are further intended to clarify and improve medical device regulation both pre and post clearance or approval. Our activities require that we make many filings with the FDA that are subject to user fee payments. Although the precise amount of fees that we will incur each year will be dependent upon the specific quantity and nature of our filings, these fees could be a significant amount per year. In addition, any products distributed pursuant to the above authorizations are subject to continuing regulation by the FDA. Products must be manufactured in registered establishments and must be manufactured in accordance with the QSR. The FDA may at any time inspect our facilities to determine whether we have adequate compliance with FDA regulations, including the QSR. The Medical Device Reporting ("MDR") regulations require that we report to the FDA any incident in which our products may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or in which our product malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury. Furthermore, we are subject to correction and removal reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA that may present a risk to health. The FDA enforces these requirements by inspection and market surveillance. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements can result in enforcement action by the FDA, which may include any of the following sanctions untitled letters, warning letters, fines, injunctions, civil penalties, recall, seizure of products, operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production, refusing requests for 510(k) clearance or PMA approval, withdrawing 510(k) clearance or PMA approval that has already been granted, and criminal prosecution. We are also subject to regulation by various state authorities, which may inspect our facilities and manufacturing processes and enforce state regulations. Failure to comply with applicable state regulations may result in seizures, injunctions or other types of enforcement actions. 11 Table of Contents Healthcare Regulation Our business is subject to extensive federal and state healthcare regulation. This includes the federal Anti Kickback Statute and similar state anti kickback laws, the federal False Claims Act, the Physician Payments Sunshine Act and similar state healthcare professional payment transparency laws, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ("HIPAA"), as amended by the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health ("HITECH") Act of 2009, and similar state laws addressing privacy and security. Although we believe that we have structured our operations to comply with the laws governing our industry, it is possible that non compliance with existing laws or the adoption of new laws or interpretations of existing laws could adversely affect our financial performance. Fraud and Abuse Laws The healthcare industry is subject to extensive federal and state regulation. In particular, the federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, receiving, offering or providing remuneration, directly or indirectly, to induce either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing, recommending or arranging for a good or service, for which payment may be made under a federal healthcare program such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The definition of "remuneration" has been broadly interpreted to include anything of value, including for example gifts, discounts, the furnishing of supplies or equipment, credit arrangements, payments of cash, waivers of payments, ownership interests, and providing anything at less than its fair market value. The Anti Kickback Statute is broad, and it prohibits many arrangements and practices that are lawful in businesses outside of the healthcare industry. Recognizing that the Anti Kickback Statute is broad and may technically prohibit many innocuous or beneficial arrangements within the healthcare industry, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services issued regulations in July of 1991, which are referred to as "safe harbors." These safe harbor regulations set forth certain provisions which, if met in form and substance, will assure healthcare providers and other parties that they will not be prosecuted under the federal Anti Kickback Statute. Additional safe harbor provisions providing similar protections have been published intermittently since 1991 Our arrangements with physicians, physician practice groups, hospitals and other persons or entities who are in a position to refer may not fully meet the stringent criteria specified in the various safe harbors. Although full compliance with these provisions ensures against prosecution under the federal Anti Kickback Statute, the failure of a transaction or arrangement to fit within a specific safe harbor does not necessarily mean that the transaction or arrangement is illegal or that prosecution under the federal Anti Kickback Statute will be pursued. Conduct and business arrangements that do not fully satisfy 1 of these safe harbor provisions may result in increased scrutiny by government enforcement authorities such as the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Office of Inspector General ("OIG"). Many states have adopted laws similar to the federal Anti Kickback Statute. Some of these state prohibitions apply to referral of patients for healthcare services reimbursed by any source, not only the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Although we believe that we have structured our operations to comply with both federal and state anti kickback laws, any finding of a violation of these laws could subject us to criminal and civil penalties or possible exclusion from federal or state healthcare programs. Such penalties would adversely affect our financial performance and our ability to operate our business. 12 Table of Contents HIPAA created new federal statutes to prevent healthcare fraud and false statements relating to healthcare matters. The healthcare fraud statute prohibits knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private payors. A violation of this statute is a felony and may result in fines, imprisonment or exclusion from government sponsored programs such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The false statements statute prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. A violation of this statute is a felony and may result in fines or imprisonment or exclusion from government sponsored programs. Both federal and state government agencies are continuing heightened and coordinated civil and criminal enforcement efforts. As part of announced enforcement agency work plans, the federal government will continue to scrutinize, among other things, the billing practices of hospitals and other providers of healthcare services. The federal government also has increased funding to fight healthcare fraud, and it is coordinating its enforcement efforts among various agencies, such as the U.S. Department of Justice, the OIG and state Medicaid fraud control units. We believe that the healthcare industry will continue to be subject to increased government scrutiny and investigations. Further, recent health care reform legislation has strengthened these laws. For example, the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act, collectively, the PPACA, among other things, amends the intent requirement of the federal anti kickback and criminal health care fraud statutes; a person or entity no longer needs to have actual knowledge of this statute or specific intent to violate it. In addition, the PPACA provides that the government may assert that a claim including Item or services resulting from a violation of the federal Anti Kickback Statute constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of the false claims statutes. The penalties for violating the Anti Kickback Statute can be severe. These sanctions include criminal penalties and civil sanctions, including fines, imprisonment and possible exclusion from the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The Physician Payments Sunshine Act, which was included in the PPACA, also imposes new reporting and disclosure requirements on device and drug manufacturers for any "transfer of value" made or distributed to prescribers and other healthcare providers. In addition, device and drug manufacturers will also be required to report and disclose any investment interests held by physicians and their immediate family members during the preceding calendar year. Failure to submit required information may result in civil m1tary penalties of up to an aggregate of $150,000 per year (and up to an aggregate of $1 million per year for "knowing failures"), for all payments, transfers of value or ownership or investment interests not reported in an annual submission. Manufacturers were required to begin data collection on August 1, 2013 and were required to report such data to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS") by June 30, 2014 and will be required to report such data to CMS by the 90 th day of each subsequent calendar year. In addition, there has been a recent trend of increased federal and state regulation of payments made to healthcare professionals for marketing. Certain states mandate implementation of compliance programs and or, tracking and reporting of gifts, compensation and other remuneration to healthcare professionals. The shifting commercial compliance environment and the need to build and maintain robust and expandable systems to comply with different compliance and or reporting requirements in multiple jurisdictions increase the possibility that a healthcare company may run afoul of 1 or more of the requirements. 13 Table of Contents Federal False Claims Act Another trend affecting the healthcare industry is the increased use of the federal False Claims Act and, in particular, actions under the False Claims Act's "whistleblower" provisions. Those provisions allow a private individual to bring actions on behalf of the government alleging that the defendant has defrauded the federal government. After the individual has initiated the lawsuit, the government must decide whether to intervene in the lawsuit and to become the primary prosecutor. If the government declines to join the lawsuit, then the individual may choose to pursue the case al1, in which case the individual's counsel will have primary control over the prosecution, although the government must be kept apprised of the progress of the lawsuit. Whether or not the federal government intervenes in the case, it will receive the majority of any recovery. If the litigation is successful, the individual is entitled to no less than 15%, but no more than 30%, of whatever amount the government recovers. The percentage of the individual's recovery varies, depending on whether the government intervened in the case and other factors. Recently, the number of suits brought against healthcare providers by private individuals has increased dramatically. In addition, various states are considering or have enacted laws modeled after the federal False Claims Act. Under the Deficit Reduction Act of 2005 ("DRA"), states are being encouraged to adopt false claims acts similar to the federal False Claims Act, which establish liability for submission of fraudulent claims to the State Medicaid program and contain whistleblower provisions. Even in instances when a whistleblower action is dismissed with no judgment or settlement, we may incur substantial legal fees and other costs relating to an investigation. Future actions under the False Claims Act may result in significant fines and legal fees, which would adversely affect our financial performance and our ability to operate our business. Further, on May 20, 2009, President Obama signed into law the Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009, which greatly expanded the types of entities and conduct subject to the False Claims Act. We strive to ensure that we comply with all such laws. However, the costs of defending claims under the False Claims Act, as well as sanctions imposed under the Act, could significantly affect our financial performance. Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 In addition to creating the new federal statutes discussed above, HIPAA also establishes uniform standards governing the conduct of certain electronic healthcare transactions and protecting the security and privacy of individually identifiable health information maintained or transmitted by healthcare providers, health plans and healthcare clearinghouses. The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, commonly referred to as the economic stimulus package, signed into law on February 17, 2009, included the HITECH Act, which dramatically expanded, among other things, (1) the scope of HIPAA to also include direct liability of a "business associate," or an individual or entity who performs functions or activities on behalf of, or provides certain services to, a covered entity that involve access by the business associate to protected health information ('PHI") or a subcontractor that creates, receives, maintains, or transmits PHI on behalf of another business associate, (2) substantive security and privacy obligations, including new federal security breach notification requirements to affected individuals and Department of Health and Human Services and potentially media outlets, (3) restrictions on marketing communications and a prohibition on covered entities or business associates from receiving remuneration in exchange for PHI with limited exceptions, and (4) the civil and criminal penalties that may be imposed for HIPAA violations, increasing the annual cap in penalties from $25,000 to $15 million per year. HIPAA and HITECH are enforced by regulations promulgated by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, including a final omnibus rule published on January 25, 2013 If we fail to comply with these standards, we could be subject to criminal penalties and civil sanctions. In addition to federal regulations issued under HIPAA and HITECH, some states have enacted privacy and security statutes or regulations that, in some cases, are more stringent than those issued under HIPAA and HITECH. In those cases it may be necessary to modify our operations and procedures to comply with the more stringent state laws, which may entail significant and costly changes for us. If we fail to comply with applicable state laws and regulations, we could be subject to additional sanctions. 14 Table of Contents International Regulations We are also subject to regulation in each of the foreign countries where our products are sold. These regulations relate to product standards, packaging and labeling requirements, import restrictions, tariff regulations, duties and tax requirements. Many of the regulations applicable to our products in these countries are similar to those of the FDA. The national health or social security organizations of certain countries require our products to be qualified before they can be marketed in those countries. In order to be positi1d for access to European and other international markets, we sought and obtained certification under the International Standards Organization ("ISO") 13485 standards. ISO 13485 is a set of integrated requirements, which when implemented, form the foundation and framework for an effective quality management system. These standards were developed and published by the ISO, a worldwide federation of national bodies, founded in Geneva, Switzerland in 1947. ISO has more than 90 member countries and ISO certification is widely regarded as essential to enter Western European markets. We obtained ISO 134852003 Certification from our Notified Body, British Standard Institute (BSI) in February 2006. Since 1998, all companies are required to obtain authority from a Notified Body to affix CE Marks for medical devices sold or distributed in the European Union. With the CE Mark, medical devices can be distributed within the European Union. A prerequisite for obtaining authority to CE Mark products is to achieve full quality system certification in accordance with ISO 13485 and European Directives, such as the Medical Device Directive ("MDD"), and the Active Implantable Medical Device Directive ("AIMD"). These are quality standards and Directives that cover design, production, installation and servicing of medical devices manufactured by us. We have obtained ISO 13485 certification and have completed the required conformity assessment procedure and design dossier reviews from our Notified Body to affix the CE Mark pursuant to the MDD, IVDD or AIMD for all of our devices in commercial distribution, including our VAD systems. We are also certified to be in compliance with the requirements of the Canadian Medical Device Regulations at all Thoratec manufacturing sites, which certification is required to sell medical devices in Canada. Other Regulations We are also subject to various international, federal, state and local laws and regulations relating to such matters as safe working conditions, laboratory and manufacturing practices and the use, handling and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous substances used in connection with our research and development and manufacturing activities. Specifically, the manufacture of our biomaterials is subject to compliance with federal environmental regulations and by various state and local agencies. Although we believe we are in compliance with these laws and regulations in all material respects, we cannot provide assurance that we will not be required to incur significant costs to comply with these and other laws or regulations in the future. The Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act imposes new disclosure requirements regarding the use of "Conflict Minerals" mined from the Democratic Republic of Congo and adjoining countries in products, whether or not these products are manufactured by third parties. The conflict minerals include tin, tantalum, tungsten and gold, and their derivatives. These new requirements could affect the pricing, sourcing and availability of minerals used in the manufacture of our products. There will be additional costs associated with complying with the disclosure requirements, such as costs related to determining the source of any conflict minerals used in our products. Our supply chain is complex and we may be unable to verify the origins for all metals used in our products. We may also encounter challenges with our customers and shareholders if we are unable to certify that our products are conflict free. 15 Table of Contents In addition, compliance with complex international and U.S. laws and regulations that apply to our international operations increases our cost of doing business. These numerous and sometimes conflicting laws and regulations include, among others, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the U. K. Bribery Act of 2010, and similar worldwide and local anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions, which generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from making improper payments to non U.S. officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Violations of these laws and regulations could result in fines and penalties, criminal sanctions against us, our officers, or our employees, prohibitions on the conduct of our business and damage to our reputation. Although we have implemented policies and procedures designed to ensure compliance with these laws and regulations as well as training on such policies and procedures, there can be no assurance that our employees, contractors, distributors and agents will not violate our policies. THIRD PARTY COVERAGE AND REIMBURSEMENT Our products are purchased primarily by customers, such as hospitals, who then bill various third party payors for the services provided to the patients. These payors, which include Medicare, Medicaid, private health insurance companies and managed care organizations, reimburse our customers based on established payment formulas that take into account part or all of the cost associated with these devices and the related procedures performed. CMS, the agency responsible for administering the Medicare program, and a majority of private insurers have approved reimbursement for our FDA approved MCS products. With approval by the FDA for HeartMate II for DT on January 20, 2010, CMS expanded coverage effective November 9, 2010 to a slightly broader population for treating Destination Therapy in late stage HF patients. As of January 3, 2015, 136 centers in the U.S. are now Joint Commission certified for Destination Therapy and eligible for reimbursement by Medicare. The majority of national insurance carriers, including Aetna, Cigna, Humana, United Health Group and UNICARE, as well as the majority of local Blue Cross and Blue Shield plans, now have policies covering the use of ventricular assist devices for FDA approved indications, including BTT and DT. Healthcare laws in the U.S. are subject to ongoing changes, including changes to the amount of reimbursement for hospital services and the manner in which such services are paid. Federal legislation in particular can substantially change the way healthcare is financed by both governmental and private insurers and may negatively impact payment rates for our products. For example, the PPACA, which was passed in March 2010, imposes significant new measures and responsibilities on the U.S. pharmaceutical and medical device industries. Among other things, the PPACA establishes annual fees and taxes on manufacturers of certain medical devices, including our devices, and promotes programs that increase the federal government's comparative effectiveness research, which may be used to evaluate the selection of medical services by clinicians and others. PPACA also implements payment system reforms such as a national pilot program on payment bundling to encourage hospitals, physicians and other providers to improve the coordination, quality and efficiency of certain healthcare services through bundled payment models, and creates an independent payment advisory board that will submit recommendations to reduce Medicare spending if projections of such spending exceed a specified growth rate. 16 Table of Contents In addition, other legislative changes have been proposed and adopted in the United States since the PPACA was enacted. The Budget Control Act of 2011, signed into law on August 2, 2011, created measures for spending reductions by Congress. A Joint Select Committee on Deficit Reduction, tasked with recommending a targeted deficit reduction of at least $12 trillion for the years 2013 through 2021, was unable to reach required goals, thereby triggering the legislation's automatic reduction to several government programs. This includes aggregate reductions to Medicare payments to providers of 2% per fiscal year, which went into effect on April 1, 2013, and, due to subsequent legislative amendments, will remain in effect through 2024 unless additional Congressional action is taken. On January 2, 2013, President Obama signed into law the American Taxpayer Relief Act of 2012, which, among other things, further reduced Medicare payments to several providers, including hospitals, imaging centers and cancer treatment centers, and increased the statute of limitations period for the government to recover overpayments to providers from 3 to five years. These new laws may result in additional reductions in Medicare and other health care funding, which could have a material adverse effect on our customers and accordingly, our financial operations. At any given time, there are a number of legislative, regulatory and other proposals under consideration that could affect our business, both within the U.S. at the federal and state levels and in foreign jurisdictions. We are unable to predict whether any such proposals will become law or in what form, and it remains uncertain how such proposals would affect our business. MANUFACTURING VADs are manufactured at our facilities located in Pleasanton, California and Zurich, Switzerland. These facilities are subject to inspection by the FDA and or European Notified Bodies to assess compliance with applicable regulatory requirements for the manufacture of medical devices, and we have received the ISO 13485 Quality Systems certification. The manufacturing processes consist of utilizing precision comp1nts fabricated from a variety of materials and assembling these comp1nts into specific configurations governed by the VAD design requirements. During the manufacturing process, the VAD assemblies are rigorously tested to meet rigid operational and quality standards. The manufacturing process relies on single sources of supply for several of the comp1nts used to manufacture VADs. We are working to identify and validate alternate sources of supply for critical comp1nts. Where alternate sources are not available, we are working to develop strategic alliances with the supplier and closely manage inventories to assure the ongoing supply of product. During 2009 and 2010, we expanded the manufacturing facility located in Pleasanton, California. The main focus of the expansion project was to provide adequate manufacturing capacity to meet demand expectations for HeartMate II. As of January 3, 2015, the renovated facility has the necessary capacity to meet the estimated requirements for our VAD products for at least the next four years. We typically have been able to fill orders from inventory and historically have not had significant backlog orders. With the expanded manufacturing capacity we believe we are in a position to accommodate the increased demand for our products. Total backlog as of the end of fiscal 2014, 2013, and 2012 was not significant. RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT Our research and development expenses in fiscal years 2014, 2013, and 2012 totaled $105.5 million, $97.4 million, and $87.7 million, respectively. Research and development costs are largely project driven, and fluctuate based on the level of project activity planned and subsequently approved and conducted. The primary comp1nts of our research and development costs are employee salaries and benefits, outside consulting, equipment and supplies, and the re measurement of the contingent consideration from our acquisitions. Projects include advancing the HeartMate II platform, such as efforts to improve the operation and performance of our VAD products and accessories, along with efforts to develop new products, such as the development of the HeartMate III, HeartMate PHP, and DuraHeart II. Research and development costs also include regulatory and clinical costs associated with our compliance with FDA regulations and clinical trials such as the HeartMate II DT pivotal trial completed in 2009 and the ongoing HeartMate III clinical trials which began in 2014. 17 Table of Contents MAJOR CUSTOMERS AND FOREIGN SALES We sell our products primarily to large hospitals and distributors. No customer accounted for more than 10% of total product sales in fiscal years 2014, 2013, and 2012 Sales originating outside of the U.S. and U.S. export sales accounted for approximately 21%, 22%, and 19% of our total product sales in 2014, 2013, and 2012, respectively. No individual foreign country accounted for more than 10% of our total product sales in any of the last 3 fiscal years. EMPLOYEES As of January 3, 2015, we had a total of 1,048 employees, consisting of 954 full time employees and 94 temporary employees. Of our total employees, 945 are employed in the U.S. and 103 are employed outside the U.S. N1 of our employees is covered by a collective bargaining agreement. We consider relations with our employees to be good. SEASONALITY Our quarterly product sales are influenced by many factors, including new product introductions, acquisitions, divestitures, regulatory approvals, and other factors. Product sales in the third quarter are typically lower than other quarters of the year due to the seasonality of the U.S. and European markets, where summer vacation schedules can result in fewer procedures. Item 1A. Risk Factors Our businesses face many risks. The risks described below are what we believe to be the material risks facing our company; however, they may not be the only risks we face. Our business operations could also be impaired by other risks of which we are not aware or that we currently believe are immaterial. If any of the events or circumstances described in the following risk factors actually occurs, our business, financial condition or results of operations could suffer, and the trading price of our common stock could decline significantly. Investors should consider the following risks, as well as the other information included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, and other documents we file from time to time with the SEC, such as our quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, our current reports on Form 8 K and any public announcements we make from time to time. If we fail to obtain clearance or approval from the FDA and from foreign regulatory authorities for our products, we will not be able to market and sell such products in the U.S. and such other countries where clearance or approval has not been obtained, and if we fail to comply with government regulations, including the FDA Quality System Regulation, or if our products experience certain adverse events, the FDA or foreign regulatory authorities may withdraw our marketing clearance or approval or take other enforcement action. Before we can market new products in the U.S., we must obtain premarket approval or 510(k) clearance from the FDA unless an exemption applies. These processes are lengthy, expensive and uncertain. If the FDA concludes that any of our products does not meet the requirements to obtain clearance under Section 510(k) of the FDCA, then we will be required to obtain a PMA for that product. A PMA application typically requires extensive pre clinical and clinical trial data. We may not obtain clearance of a 510(k) premarket notification or approval of a PMA application with respect to any of our products on a timely basis, if at all. If we fail to obtain timely clearance or approval for our products, we will not be able to market and sell them, thereby harming our ability to generate sales. The FDA also may limit the claims that we can make about our products. We also may be required to obtain clearance of a 510(k) notification, a new PMA, or a PMA Supplement from the FDA before we can market products that have already been cleared, but that have since been modified or that we subsequently wish to market for new indications. In the U.S., our currently commercialized products have either received premarket clearance or approval of a PMA. 18 Table of Contents In addition, our medical device products and operations are subject to extensive and ongoing regulation by the FDA pursuant to the FDCA and by various other federal, state and foreign governmental authorities. Government regulations and foreign requirements specific to medical devices are wide ranging and govern, among other things, design, development, manufacture, testing, labeling, storage, marketing, distribution, promotion, record keeping, and approval or clearance. The FDA requires us and certain of our third party suppliers to adhere to Quality System Regulations ("QSR"), which include production design controls, testing, quality control, and labeling, packaging, sterilization, and storage and documentation procedures. The FDA may at any time inspect our facilities to determine whether we have adequate compliance with the FDA's QSR and other regulatory requirements. Compliance with the QSR for medical devices is difficult and costly. If our facilities or those of our suppliers fail to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse QSR inspection, the FDA could take enforcement action. For example, the FDA has issued and could in the future issue warning letters or other communications to us. If we fail to satisfy or remediate the matters discussed in any such warning letters or communications, the FDA could take further enforcement action, including prohibiting the sale or marketing of the affected product. The FDA also strictly regulates labeling, advertising, promotion, and other activities relating to the marketing of our products. Medical devices may be promoted only for their cleared or approved indications and in accordance with the provisions of the cleared or approved label. It is possible that federal or state enforcement authorities might take action if they consider our promotional or training materials to constitute promotion of an unapproved use, which could result in significant fines or penalties under a variety of statutory authorities, including under the FDCA as well as laws prohibiting false claims for reimbursement. In addition, the FDA or other regulatory agencies may change their policies, adopt additional regulations or revise existing regulations, or take other actions which may prevent or delay approval or clearance of our products under development or impact our ability to modify our currently approved or cleared products on a timely basis. For example, as part of FDASIA, Congress reauthorized the Medical Device User Fee Amendments with various FDA performance goal commitments and enacted several "Medical Device Regulatory Improvements" and miscellaneous reforms which are further intended to clarify and improve medical device regulation both pre and post approval. Moreover, the FDA and Congress continue to propose initiatives that are designed to, among other things, improve the efficiency and transparency of the regulatory review and clearance process and bolster patient safety. It is unclear what, if any, of these proposals will be finalized or enacted. We may be found noncompliant as a result of future changes in, or interpretations of, regulations by the FDA or other regulatory agencies. Sales of our products outside the U.S. are subject to foreign regulatory requirements that vary from country to country. The time required to obtain approvals from foreign countries may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval, and requirements for foreign licensing may differ from FDA requirements. In any event, if we fail to obtain the necessary clearance or approvals to sell any of our products in a foreign country, or if any obtained clearance or approval is revoked or suspended, we will not be able to sell those products there. The federal, state and foreign laws and regulations regarding the manufacture and sale of our products are subject to future changes, as are administrative interpretations and policies of regulatory agencies. If we fail to comply with applicable federal, state or foreign laws or regulations, we could be subject to enforcement actions. Enforcement actions could include product seizures, recalls, withdrawal of clearances or approvals, and civil and criminal penalties, which in each case would harm our business. 19 Table of Contents If hospitals do not continue to conduct Destination Therapy procedures using our VADs, the market opportunities for our products will be diminished. The use of certain of our VADs as long term therapy in patients who are not candidates for heart transplantation (i.e., Destination Therapy patients) was approved by the FDA in 2002, and was approved for coverage and reimbursement by the CMS, the agency responsible for administering the Medicare program, in late 2003 We received FDA approval for the HeartMate II in Destination Therapy on January 20, 2010. The number of Destination Therapy procedures actually performed depends on many factors, many of which are out of our direct control, including, but not limited to, the following the number of CMS sites approved for Destination Therapy; the clinical outcomes of Destination Therapy procedures relative to pharmacological, gene and cell based therapies, and other device based alternatives; cardiologists' and referring physicians' education regarding, and their commitment to, Destination Therapy; the economics of the Destination Therapy procedure for individual hospitals, which include the costs of the VAD and related pre and post operative procedures and their reimbursement; the impact of changes in reimbursement rates on the timing of purchases of VADs for Destination Therapy; and the economics for individual hospitals of not conducting a Destination Therapy procedure, including the costs and related reimbursements of long term hospitalization. The different outcomes of these and other factors, and their timing, will have a significant impact on our future product sales. Physicians may not accept or continue to accept our current products and products under development. The success of our current and future products will require acceptance or continued acceptance by cardiovascular and vascular surgeons, cardiologists and other medical professionals. Such acceptance will depend on clinical results, as well as the results of any post approval clinical trials that we may conduct, and the conclusion by these professionals that our products are and continue to be safe, cost effective and acceptable methods of treatment. Even if the safety and efficacy of our future products are established, physicians may elect not to use them for a number of reasons. These reasons could include the high cost of our VAD systems, restrictions on insurance coverage, unfavorable reimbursement from healthcare payors, or use of alternative therapies including pharmacological, gene and cell based therapies, and other device based alternatives. Also, economic, psychological, ethical and other concerns may limit general acceptance of our ventricular assist products. If we fail to compete successfully against our existing or potential competitors, our product sales or operating results may be harmed. Competition from medical device companies and medical device divisions of healthcare companies, pharmaceutical companies and gene and cell based therapies is intense and is expected to increase. The vast majority of VAD eligible patients still receive pharmacological treatment instead of a VAD. We continue to expect new competitors both from the pharmacological and the medical device space. Among the medical device competitors are Aachen Innovative Solutions GmbH, AbioMed, Inc., Berlin Heart GmbH, HeartWare International Inc., Jarvik Heart, Inc., Maquet Cardiovascular, LLC (a division of Getinge AB), ReliantHeart, Inc., Sun Medical Technology Research Corporation, SynCardia Systems, Inc., and Terumo Heart, Inc. 20 Table of Contents Some of our competitors have substantially greater financial, technical, distribution, marketing and manufacturing resources than we do, while other competitors have different technologies that may achieve broader customer acceptance or better cost structures than our products. Accordingly, our competitors may be able to develop, manufacture and market products more efficiently, at a lower cost and with more market acceptance than we can. In addition, new drugs or other devices may provide additional alternatives to VADs. We expect that the key competitive factors will include the relative speed with which we can develop products; complete clinical testing; receive regulatory approvals; achieve market acceptance; achieve favorable clinical results; and manufacture and sell commercial quantities of products. Any of the devices of our competitors currently available, in clinical trials or in development could prove to be, or be perceived by our customers as being, clinically superior, easier to implant, and or less expensive than current commercialized devices, thereby impacting our market share. We rely on specialized and single source suppliers for certain comp1nts and materials in our products and alternative suppliers may not be available. We depend on a number of custom designed comp1nts and materials supplied by other companies including, in some cases, single source suppliers for comp1nts, instruments and materials used in our VAD products. For example, a single source supplier currently manufactures and supplies comp1nts used to manufacture the ruby bearings used in the HeartMate II pump. We do not have long term written agreements with most of our suppliers and receive comp1nts from these suppliers on a purchase order basis only. If we need alternative sources for key raw materials or comp1nt parts for any reason, such alternative sources may not be available and our inventory may not be sufficient to fill orders before we find alternative suppliers or begin manufacturing these comp1nts or materials ourselves. Cessation or interruption of sales of circulatory support products may seriously harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. Alternative suppliers, if available, may not agree to supply us. In addition, FDA approval may be required before using new suppliers or manufacturing our own comp1nts or materials, which can take additional time to procure. Existing suppliers could also become subject to an FDA enforcement action, which could also disrupt our supplies. If alternative suppliers are not available, we may not have the expertise or resources necessary to produce these materials or comp1nt parts internally. Because of the long product development cycle in our business, or because we do not always purchase goods in significant quantities, suppliers may discontinue comp1nts upon which we rely before the end of life of our products. In addition, the timing of the discontinuation may not allow us time to develop and obtain FDA approval for a replacement comp1nt before we exhaust our inventory of the legacy comp1nt. If suppliers discontinue comp1nts on which we rely, we may have to pay premium prices to keep our existing suppliers' production lines open or to obtain alternative suppliers; buy substantial inventory to last through the scheduled end of life of our products, or through such time that we expect to have a replacement product developed and approved by the FDA; or 21 Table of Contents stop shipping the product in which the legacy comp1nt is used once our inventory of the discontinued comp1nt is exhausted. Any of these interruptions in the supply of our materials could result in substantial reductions in product sales and increases in our production costs. We may encounter problems manufacturing our products. We may encounter difficulties manufacturing products in quantities sufficient to meet demand. If, for instance, the FDA approves or clears a new product or a new indication for an existing product, we may not be able to manufacture such product in the quantities needed to meet the increased commercial demand for such product on a timely basis. In addition, any alterations or modifications to an existing product may result in increased manufacturing lead times for such products. Moreover, we and some of our third party manufacturers and suppliers are required to comply with the FDA's QSR and the regulations of foreign jurisdictions regarding the manufacturing process for products marketed abroad. Our facilities are subject to periodic and unannounced inspection by U.S. and foreign regulatory agencies to audit compliance with the QSR and comparable foreign regulations. If our facilities or those of our manufacturers or suppliers are found to be in violation of applicable laws and regulations, or if we or our manufacturers or suppliers fail to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse QSR inspection, the regulatory authority could take enforcement action. If we have difficulty manufacturing any of our products, or we or our suppliers fail to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, our ability to produce products in a cost effective and timely manner will be impaired, our sales may prove lower than would otherwise be the case, and our reputation, business, financial condition and results of operations could be harmed. Identified quality problems can result in substantial costs and write downs. FDA regulations require us to track materials used in the manufacture of our products, so that any problems identified in a finished product can easily be traced back to other finished products containing the defective materials. In some instances, identified quality issues require scrapping or expensive rework of the affected lot(s), not just the tested defective product, and could also require us to stop shipments. In addition, because some of our products are used in situations where a malfunction can be life threatening, identified material deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture or labeling can result in the recall and replacement, generally free of charge, of substantial amounts of products already implanted or otherwise in the marketplace. Manufacturers may, on their own initiative, initiate actions, including a non reportable market withdrawal or a reportable product recall, for the purpose of correcting a material deficiency or improving device performance, or for other reasons. Additionally, the FDA and similar foreign governmental authorities have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products. In the case of the FDA, the authority to require a recall must be based on an FDA finding that there is a reasonable probability that the device would cause serious injury or death. A government mandated or voluntary recall by us or 1 of our distributors could occur as a result of comp1nt failures, manufacturing errors, design or labeling defects or other deficiencies and issues. Recalls of any of our products would divert managerial and financial resources and have an adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. We may initiate certain voluntary recalls, which can include field safety notices or physical product removal, involving our products in the future. Companies are required to maintain certain records of recalls, even if they are not reportable to the FDA. If we determine that certain of those recalls do not require notification of the FDA, the FDA may disagree with our determinations and require us to report those actions as recalls. A future recall announcement could harm our reputation with customers, negatively affect our sales, and subject us to additional FDA enforcement actions. 22 Table of Contents Moreover, depending on the corrective action we take to redress a product's deficiencies or defects, the FDA may require, or we may decide, that we will need to obtain new approvals or clearances for the device before we may market or distribute the corrected device. Seeking such approvals or clearances may delay our ability to replace the recalled devices in a timely manner. If we do not adequately address problems associated with our devices, we may face additional regulatory enforcement action, including FDA warning letters, product seizure, injunctions, administrative penalties, or civil or criminal fines. Any identified quality issue can therefore both harm our business reputation and result in substantial costs and write offs, which in either case could materially harm our business and financial results. If we fail to successfully introduce new products, our future growth may suffer. As part of our growth strategy, we intend to develop and introduce a number of new products and product improvements. We also intend to develop new indications for our existing products. If we fail to obtain clearance or approval from the FDA or other foreign governmental authorities and fail to successfully commercialize any of these new products or product improvements or to develop new indications on a timely basis, or if such products, product improvements or indications are not well accepted by the market, our future growth may suffer. If we are unable to successfully complete the pre clinical studies or clinical trials necessary to support our PMA applications or PMA supplements, our ability to obtain new approvals will be limited. Before submitting a PMA application, we must successfully complete pre clinical studies and clinical trials to demonstrate that the product is safe and effective. Product development, including pre clinical studies and clinical trials, is a long, expensive and uncertain process and is subject to delays, and failure may occur at any stage. Furthermore, the data obtained from the trial may be inadequate to support approval of a PMA application. The commencement or completion of any of our clinical trials may be delayed or halted, or be inadequate to support approval of a PMA application, for numerous reasons, including, but not limited to, the following the FDA or other regulatory authorities do not approve a clinical trial protocol or a clinical trial, or place a clinical trial on hold; patients do not enroll in clinical trials at the rate we expect; patients do not comply with trial protocols; patient follow up is not at the rate we expect; patients experience adverse side effects; patients die during a clinical trial, even though their death may not be related to our products; institutional review boards and third party clinical investigators delay or reject our trial protocol; third party clinical investigators decline to participate in a trial or do not perform a trial on our anticipated schedule or consistent with the clinical trial protocol, good clinical practices or other regulatory requirements; third party organizations do not perform data collection and analysis in a timely and accurate manner; regulators inspect our clinical trials or manufacturing facilities, which may, among other things, require us to undertake corrective action or suspend or terminate our clinical trials; there are changes in governmental regulations or administrative actions; 23 Table of Contents the interim or final results of a clinical trial are inconclusive or unfavorable as to safety or efficacy; and the FDA concludes that our trial design is inadequate to demonstrate safety and efficacy. The results of pre clinical studies do not necessarily predict future clinical trial results, and predecessor clinical trial results may not be repeated in subsequent clinical trials. Additionally, the FDA may disagree with our interpretation of the data from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials, or may find the clinical trial design, conduct or results inadequate to prove safety or efficacy, and may require us to pursue additional pre clinical studies or clinical trials, which could further delay the approval of our products. If we are unable to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of our products in our clinical trials, we will be unable to obtain regulatory approval to market our products. The data we collect from our current clinical trials, our pre clinical studies and other clinical trials may not be sufficient to support FDA approval. Moreover, if the results of any post market clinical studies are not favorable, our existing clearances or approvals may be impacted. Our inability to protect our proprietary technologies or an infringement of others' patents could harm our competitive position. We rely on patents, trade secrets, copyrights, know how, trademarks, license agreements and contractual provisions to establish our intellectual property rights and protect our products. These legal means, however, afford only limited protection and may not adequately protect our rights. In addition, we cannot assure you that any of our pending patent applications will issue. Governmental intellectual property authorities, in the U.S. and abroad, may deny or significantly narrow claims made under patent applications and the issued patents, if any, may not provide us with commercial protection. We could incur substantial costs in any future litigation to enforce our patents in court. These proceedings could result in adverse decisions as to the validity and or enforceability of our patents. In addition, the laws of some of the countries in which our products are or may be sold may not protect our products and intellectual property to the same extent as U.S. laws, if at all. We may be unable to protect our rights in trade secrets and unpatented proprietary technology in these countries. Many aspects of VAD products are not protected by any patents and, in such instances, we generally rely on trade secret protection and contractual provisions to protect our rights to our products and technology. We seek to protect our trade secrets and unpatented proprietary technology, in part, with confidentiality agreements with our employees and consultants. Although it is our policy to require that all employees and consultants sign such agreements, we cannot assure you that every person who gains or has gained access to such information has d1 or will do so. Moreover, these agreements may be breached and we may not have an adequate remedy when we learn of such breach, if at all. Intellectual property litigation is inherently complex and the results uncertain. Our products may be found to infringe prior or future patents owned by others. We may need to pay significant m1tary damages and or acquire patent licenses with royalty payments. Additionally, adverse outcomes in intellectual property trial proceedings could limit our ability to sell current or future products. We could incur substantial costs in defending suits brought against us on such patents or in bringing suits to protect our patents or patents licensed by us against infringement. Because we depend upon distributors in certain foreign markets, if we lose a distributor or a distributor fails to perform, our operations may be harmed. With the exception of Canada, Australia, and certain countries in Europe, we sell our Thoratec, HeartMate, and CentriMag product lines in foreign markets through distributors. 24 Table of Contents To the extent we rely on distributors, our success will depend upon the efforts of others, over whom we may have little or no control. Further, contractual, regulatory and legal considerations may make it difficult to terminate an underperforming distributor and to appoint suitable replacements when distributors are terminated or lost, which could harm our product sales, results of operations and reputation in the affected territories. Our non U.S. sales present additional risks, which could harm our operations or financial results. A substantial portion of our total sales occurs outside the U.S. We anticipate that sales outside the U.S. and U.S. export sales will continue to account for a significant percentage of our product sales and we intend to continue to expand our presence in international markets. Non U.S. sales are subject to a number of additional risks. For example we sell some of our products at lower prices outside the U.S.; sales agreements with foreign customers and distributors may be difficult to enforce; receivables may be difficult to collect through a foreign country's legal system; fluctuations in exchange rates may affect product demand and adversely affect the profitability, in U.S. dollars, of products sold in foreign markets where payments are made in other currencies; foreign customers and distributors may have longer payment cycles; foreign countries may impose additional withholding taxes or otherwise tax our foreign income, impose tariffs or adopt other restrictions on foreign trade; U.S. export licenses may be difficult to obtain; intellectual property rights may be (and often are) more difficult to enforce in foreign countries; terrorist activity or war may interrupt distribution channels or adversely impact our customers or employees; and fluctuations in macroeconomic conditions, specifically among emerging markets, could materially impact demand for our products in individual countries. Any of these events could harm our operations or financial results. Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates could result in declines in our reported sales and earnings. Because some of our international sales are denominated in currencies other than U.S. dollars, our reported sales and earnings are subject to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. At present, we use forward foreign currency contracts to protect the gains and losses created by the re measurement of non functional currency denominated assets and liabilities. However, we do not hedge foreign currency exposures that will arise from future sales. As a result, sales occurring in the future that are denominated in foreign currencies may be translated into U.S. dollars at a less favorable rate than our current exchange rate resulting in reduced revenues and earnings. The long and variable sales and deployment cycles for our VAD systems may cause our product sales and operating results to vary significantly, which increases the risk of an operating loss for any given fiscal period. Our VAD systems have lengthy sales cycles and we may incur substantial sales and marketing expenses and expend significant effort without making a sale. Even after making the decision to purchase our VAD systems, our customers often deploy our products slowly. For example, the length of time between initial contact with potential customers and the purchase of our VAD systems is generally between nine and eighteen months. In addition, cardiac centers that buy the majority of our products are usually led by cardiac surgeons who are heavily recruited by competing centers or by centers looking to increase their profiles. When 1 of these surgeons moves to a new center we sometimes experience a temporary but significant reduction in purchases by the departed center while it replaces its lead surgeon. As a result, it is difficult for us to predict the quarter in which customers may purchase our VAD systems and our product sales and operating results may vary significantly from quarter to quarter, which increases the risk of an operating loss for us for any given quarter. 25 Table of Contents Because our physician and hospital customers depend on third party reimbursement, if third party payors, including government agencies such as the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, fail to provide appropriate levels of reimbursement for our products, our results of operations will be harmed. Similarly, if third party payors decide to restrict coverage or the ability of hospital customers to treat patients using VAD therapy, our results of operations could also be harmed. Governmental and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs. Payors are attempting to contain costs by, for example, limiting coverage and the level of reimbursement of new therapeutic products. Payors are also attempting to contain costs, in some cases by refusing to provide any coverage for uses of approved products for disease indications other than those for which the FDA has granted marketing approval. To date, a majority of private insurers with whom we have been involved, as well as CMS, which is responsible for implementing the Medicare program, have determined to reimburse some or all of the cost associated with the implantation of our VADs, but we cannot predict whether our products or the services performed with the use of our products will continue to be approved for reimbursement in whole or in part. In addition, changes in the healthcare system may affect the reimbursability of future products. If coverage were partially or completely reduced, our revenues and results of operations would be harmed. This uncertainty could delay or prevent adoption by hospitals of our products. Healthcare laws and regulations may change significantly in the future, which could adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. We continuously monitor these developments and modify our operations from time to time as the legislative and regulatory environment changes. We are unable to predict whether any current congressional proposals will become law or in what form, whether any additional or similar changes to statutes or regulations (including interpretations) will occur in the future, or what effect any such legislation or regulation, if implemented, would have on our business. The federal government is expected to have increasing involvement in the healthcare industry, and such increasing involvement may adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. For a more detailed discussion of the various state and federal legislative changes see "Business Third Party Coverage and Reimbursement." Complying with federal, state and international laws and regulations is an expensive and time consuming process, and any failure to comply could result in substantial penalties. We are directly or indirectly through our customers subject to extensive regulation by both the federal government and the states in which we conduct our business, including the regulation under the federal Anti Kickback Statute and similar state anti kickback laws, the federal False Claims Act, HIPAA, HITECH and similar state laws addressing information privacy and security, federal and state healthcare professional payment transparency laws, state corporate practice of medicine and fee splitting prohibitions, state certificate of need laws, the Medicare and Medicaid statutes and regulations, the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement and Modernization Act of 2003 and the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act ("FCPA"), among other federal and state regulations. Both federal and state government agencies have heightened and coordinated civil and criminal enforcement efforts as part of numerous ongoing investigations of healthcare companies, as well as their executives and managers. These investigations relate to a wide variety of matters, including referral and billing practices. The OIG and the Department of Justice have, from time to time, established national enforcement initiatives that focus on specific billing practices or other suspected areas of abuse. Some of our activities could become the subject of governmental investigations or inquiries. 26 Table of Contents In addition, the Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act imposes disclosure requirements regarding the use of "Conflict Minerals" mined from the Democratic Republic of Congo and adjoining countries in products, whether or not these products are manufactured by third parties. The conflict minerals include tin, tantalum, tungsten and gold, and their derivatives. These requirements could affect the pricing, sourcing and availability of minerals used in the manufacture of our products. There are costs associated with complying with the disclosure requirements, such as costs related to determining the source of any conflict minerals used in our products. Our supply chain is complex and we may be unable to verify the origins for all metals used in our products. We may also encounter challenges with our customers and shareholders if we are unable to certify that our products are conflict free. As a result of our international operations, we are also subject to numerous and sometimes conflicting U.S. and foreign laws and regulations that increase the cost of doing business in each of the foreign countries where our products are sold. These laws and regulations include the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act of 2010 and similar worldwide and local anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions, transparency laws and laws addressing information privacy and security. Although, we have implemented policies and procedures designed to ensure compliance with these laws and regulations as well as training on such policies and procedures, there can be no assurance that our employees, contractors, distributors and agents will not violate our policies. If our operations are found to be in violation of any of the laws and regulations to which we are subject, we may be subject to the applicable penalty associated with the violation, including civil and criminal penalties, damages, fines and the curtailment of our operations. Any penalties, damages, fines or curtailment of our operations, individually or in the aggregate, could adversely affect our ability to operate our business and our financial results. Our risk of being found in violation of these laws and regulations is increased by the fact that many of them have not been fully interpreted by the regulatory authorities or the courts, and their provisions are open to a variety of interpretations. Any action against us for violation of these laws or regulations, even if we successfully defend against it, could cause us to incur significant legal expenses and divert management's attention from the operation of our business. For a more detailed discussion of the various state, federal, and international regulations to which we are subject see "Business Government Regulations" and "Business Third Party Coverage and Reimbursement." See also the risks described under the heading " If we fail to comply with federal and state anti kickback laws, our operations and income may be adversely affected" in this "Risk Factors" section. We depend on HeartMate II for a significant portion of our revenues. We derive, and expect to continue to derive, a significant portion of our revenues from sales of our HeartMate II product. While we cannot predict what level of revenues our HeartMate II product will generate, we anticipate that HeartMate II pump sales will continue to account for a significant portion of our revenues in the foreseeable future. Implementation of our strategy depends on continued sales of our HeartMate II product. Sales of our HeartMate II product are subject to the factors described in this "Risk Factors" section, including, but not limited to, the following failure to obtain clearance or approval from the FDA and foreign regulatory authorities or to comply with government regulations, or the withdrawal of market clearance or approval or the taking of other enforcement actions; lack of Destination Therapy procedures conducted by hospitals using our VADs; lack of acceptance or continued acceptance by physicians; reliance on specialized suppliers for certain comp1nts and materials; manufacturing problems; 27 Table of Contents any identified quality problems; inability to protect our proprietary technologies or an infringement of others' patents; loss of a distributor or distributor failure to perform; failure to compete successfully against our existing or potential competitors; special risks associated with non U.S. sales; long and variable sales and deployment cycles; failure by third party payors to provide appropriate levels of reimbursement; failure to comply with federal and state regulations; and product liability claims. The outcomes of these and other factors will have a significant impact on our future HeartMate II product sales and our revenues. Healthcare legislative reform measures may adversely affect our business and results of operations. In March 2010, the U.S. President signed the PPACA, which makes changes that are expected to significantly impact the pharmaceutical and medical device industries. We are continuing to evaluate the impact of this legislation on our business as its various provisions are implemented. It may adversely affect the demand for our products and services, and therefore our financial position and results of operations, possibly materially. Specifically, 1 of the comp1nts of the new law is an excise tax on sales of most medical devices, which include our MCS products that began in 2013 Though there are some exceptions to the excise tax, this excise tax applies to most of our product revenue generated within the U.S. The Congressional Budget Office estimates that the total cost to the medical device industry could exceed $30 billion over ten years. This tax may put increased pressure on medical device manufacturers and purchasers, decrease profits to us, and or reduce medical procedure volumes, which may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Other elements of the PPACA, including comparative effectiveness research, an independent payment advisory board, payment system reforms (including shared savings pilots) and the reporting of certain payments by us to healthcare professionals and hospitals (the "Physician Payment Sunshine Act"), could meaningfully change the way healthcare is developed and delivered, and may materially impact numerous aspects of our business. Various healthcare reform proposals have also emerged at the state and federal levels, and we are unable to predict which, if any of these proposals will be enacted. We believe that the uncertainty created by healthcare reform in the U.S. has complicated our customers' decision making process and may impact our MCS business, and we expect that this uncertainty will persist until there is greater clarity on how the PPACA and state and federal proposals will affect healthcare providers. We are unable to predict what effect the ongoing uncertainty surrounding these matters will have on our customers' purchasing decisions. However, an expansion in government's role in the U.S. healthcare industry may adversely affect our business, possibly materially. 28 Table of Contents If we fail to comply with federal and state anti kickback laws, our operations and income may be adversely affected. Various federal and state laws govern financial arrangements among healthcare providers. The federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits the knowing and willful offer, payment, solicitation or receipt of any form of remuneration in return for, or to induce, the referral of Medicare, Medicaid or other federal healthcare program patients, or in return for, or to induce, the purchase, lease or order of Item or services that are covered by Medicare, Medicaid or other federal healthcare programs. Many state laws also prohibit the solicitation, payment or receipt of remuneration in return for, or to induce, the referral of patients in private as well as government programs. Violation of these laws may result in substantial civil or criminal penalties and or exclusion from participation in federal or state healthcare programs. While we believe that we have structured our operations and our arrangements with providers to comply with the federal and state anti kickback laws, it is possible that these laws could be interpreted in a manner that could have an adverse effect on our operations. In addition, under the DRA, states are encouraged to adopt false claims acts, similar to the federal False Claims Act, which establish liability for submission of fraudulent claims to the State Medicaid program and contain qui tam or whistleblower provisions. States enacting such false claims statutes will receive an increased percentage of any recovery from a State Medicaid judgment or settlement. Adoption of new false claims statutes in states where we operate may impose additional requirements or burdens on us, which could adversely affect our operations and income. For a more detailed discussion of the various state and federal anti kickback regulations to which we are subject see "Business Government Regulations". Our liabilities expose us to risks that could adversely affect our business, operating results and financial condition. If we experience a decline in product sales due to any of the factors described in this "Risk Factors" section or otherwise, we could have difficulty paying current and total liabilities. If we are unable to generate sufficient cash flow or otherwise obtain funds necessary to make required payments, or if we fail to comply with the various requirements of our current and total liabilities, we would be in default. It may be difficult for us to obtain any necessary financing in the future for working capital, capital expenditures, debt service, acquisitions or general corporate purposes, and therefore limit our flexibility in planning for or reacting to changes in our business by reducing funds available for use in our operations. This could make us more vulnerable in the event of a downturn in our business or an increase in interest rates and place us at a possible competitive disadvantage relative to less leveraged competitors and competitors that have better access to capital resources. Any failure to meet our obligations under our current and long term liabilities could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. Valuation adjustments to goodwill and intangible assets, which represent a significant portion of our total assets, may adversely affect our net income and we may never realize the full value of our intangible assets. A substantial portion of our assets is comprised of goodwill and intangible assets, recorded as a result of our merger with Thermo Cardiosystems, Inc. in 2001, the acquisition of Levitronix Medical in 2011, the acquisition of DuraHeart II in 2013, and the acquisition of Apica Cardiovascular Limited in 2014. We may not receive the recorded value for our intangible assets if we sell or liquidate our business or assets. The material concentration of intangible assets or goodwill increases the risk of a large charge to earnings if recoverability of these intangible assets or goodwill is impaired, which would have an adverse effect on our net income. For example, in fiscal 2012 we recorded an impairment charge of $50.2 million related to the intangibles assets from our merger with Thermo Cardiosystems, Inc. 29 Table of Contents Product liability claims could damage our reputation and hurt our financial results. Our business exposes us to an inherent risk of potential product liability claims related to the manufacturing, marketing, and sale of medical devices. We maintain a limited amount of product liability insurance. Our insurance policies generally must be renewed on an annual basis. We may not be able to maintain or increase such insurance on acceptable terms or at reasonable costs, and such insurance may not provide us with adequate coverage against all potential liabilities. A successful claim brought against us in excess, or outside, of our insurance coverage could seriously harm our financial condition and results of operations. Claims against us, regardless of their merit or potential outcome, may also reduce our ability to obtain physician acceptance of our products or expand our business. The competition for qualified personnel is particularly intense in our industry. If we are unable to retain or hire key personnel, we may not be able to sustain or grow our business. Our ability to operate successfully and manage our potential future growth depends significantly upon retaining key research, technical, clinical, regulatory, sales, marketing, managerial and financial personnel, and attracting and retaining additional highly qualified personnel in these areas. We face intense competition for such personnel, and we may not be able to attract and retain these individuals. We compete for talent with numerous companies, as well as universities and nonprofit research organizations, throughout all our locations. The loss of key personnel for any reason or our inability to hire and retain additional qualified personnel in the future could prevent us from sustaining or growing our business. Our success will depend in large part on the continued services of our research, managerial and manufacturing personnel. We cannot assure you that we will continue to be able to attract and retain sufficient qualified personnel. The price of our common stock may fluctuate significantly. The price of our common stock has been, and is likely to continue to be, volatile, which means that it could decline substantially within a short period of time. For example, our closing stock price ranged from $2274 to $38.66 during the twelve months ended January 3, 2015. The price of our common stock could fluctuate significantly for many reasons, including but not limited to the following future announcements concerning us or our competitors; regulatory developments, including ongoing healthcare reform initiatives, enforcement actions bearing on advertising, marketing or sales, and disclosure regarding completed ongoing or future clinical trials; enforcement actions or civil or criminal investigations or suits by the FDA, SEC, DOJ, OCR, OIG or state or foreign regulatory authorities; reports of adverse events or poor clinical results, including in the form of scientific papers; initiation or resolution of product liability claims involving 1 or more of our devices; quarterly variations in operating results, which we have experienced in the past and expect to experience in the future; introduction of new products or changes in product pricing policies by us or our competitors; acquisition or loss of significant customers, distributors or suppliers; reaction to our estimates of business operations, product development or financial performance; business acquisitions or divestitures; changes in our capital structure, liquidity profile or ability to access capital markets for additional financing; 30 Table of Contents changes in earnings estimates by analysts; changes in third party reimbursement practices; announced common stock repurchases; charges, amortization and other financial effects relating to our business; fluctuations in the economy, world political events or general market conditions; and the realization or occurrence of a situation or event described in this Risk Factors section. In addition, stock markets in general and the market for shares of healthcare stocks in particular, have experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations, including recently as a result of the global financial crisis. These fluctuations can be unrelated to the operating performance of the affected companies. These broad market fluctuations may adversely affect the market price of our common stock. The market price of our common stock could decline below its current price and the market price of our stock may fluctuate significantly in the future. These fluctuations may be unrelated to our performance. Shareholders often have instituted securities class action litigation after periods of volatility in the market price of a company's securities. Securities class action suits have been filed against us in the past, including most recently in January 2014, resulting in substantial legal fees and our management's attention and resources being diverted from operating our business in order to respond to the litigation. Global economic, political and market conditions could adversely affect our business and liquidity. Our operations and performance depend significantly on global economic, political and market conditions. Uncertainty about global economic, political and market conditions poses a risk as consumers and businesses decrease or postp1 spending in response to tighter credit, unemployment, negative financial news and or declines in income or asset values. Renewed concerns about the systemic impact of the recent recession, energy costs, geopolitical issues, the availability and cost of credit, or the global housing and mortgage markets could contribute to increased market volatility and diminished expectations for mature and emerging economies. The cost and availability of credit may be adversely affected by illiquid credit markets and wider credit spreads, potentially leading to a decrease in spending by businesses and consumers alike. Global economic, political and material conditions could have a material adverse effect on our business and the demand for our products and services. In addition, turbulence in the U.S. and international markets and economies and prolonged declines in spending may adversely affect our liquidity and financial condition, and the liquidity and financial condition of our distributors, customers and suppliers, including ours and their ability to refinance maturing liabilities and access the capital markets to meet liquidity needs. If we make acquisitions or divestitures, we could encounter difficulties that harm our business. We may acquire other companies or their products or technologies that we believe to be complementary to our business, such as the purchase of Levitronix Medical in August 2011, DuraHeart II in June 2013, and Apica Cardiovascular Limited in 2014. We may have difficulty integrating the acquired personnel and operations, or developing the products or technologies, and we may not realize the expected benefits of any such acquisition. As with any product or technology still under development, the products or technologies we acquire may never be commercialized. In addition, acquisitions may dilute our earnings per share, disrupt our ongoing business, distract our management and employees and increase our expenses, any of which could harm our business. We may also sell businesses or assets, such as the 2010 sale of our wholly owned subsidiary, International Technidyne Corporation, and we may sell an asset or business for less than its carrying value. 31 Table of Contents We have experienced rapid growth and changes in our business, and our failure to manage this and any future growth could harm our business. The number of our employees has substantially increased during the past several years. We expect to continue to increase the number of our employees, and our business may suffer if we do not manage and train our new employees effectively. Our product sales may not continue to grow at a rate sufficient to support the costs associated with an increasing number of employees. Any future periods of rapid growth may place significant strains on our managerial, financial and other resources. The rate of any future expansion, in combination with our complex technologies and products, may demand an unusually high level of managerial effectiveness in anticipating, planning, coordinating and meeting our operational needs, as well as the needs of our customers. If we are unable to meet these demands our reputation, revenue and results of operations could be harmed. Revisions to accounting standards and financial reporting and corporate governance requirements could result in changes to our standard practices and could require a significant expenditure of time, attention and resources, especially by senior management. We must follow accounting standards and financial reporting and corporate governance requirements and tax laws set by the governing bodies and lawmakers in the U.S. and in other jurisdictions where we do business, as well as NASDAQ. From time to time, these governing bodies and lawmakers implement new and revised rules and laws. These new and revised accounting standards and financial reporting and corporate governance requirements may require changes to our financial statements, the composition of our Board of Directors, the responsibility and manner of operation of various board level committees and the information filed by us with the governing bodies. Our accounting practices that recently have been or may be affected by changes in the accounting principles are as follows accounting for revenue recognition; accounting for intangibles goodwill and other; fair value measurement; accounting for convertible debt instruments; accounting for income taxes; accounting for leases; and accounting for business combinations. Implementing changes required by new standards, requirements or laws likely will require a significant expenditure of time, attention and resources. It is impossible to completely predict the impact, if any, on us of future changes to accounting standards and financial reporting and corporate governance requirements. We use estimates, make judgments and apply certain methods in measuring the progress of our business in determining our financial results and in applying our accounting policies. As these estimates, judgments and methods change, our assessment of the progress of our business and our results of operations could vary. The methods, estimates and judgments we use in applying our accounting policies have a significant impact on our results of operations. Such methods, estimates and judgments are, by their nature, subject to substantial risks, uncertainties and assumptions, and factors may arise over time that may lead us to change our methods, estimates and judgments. Changes in any of our assumptions may cause variation in our reporting and may adversely affect our reported financial results. 32 Table of Contents The occurrence of a catastrophic disaster or other similar events could cause damage to our facilities and equipment, or those of our suppliers, which would require us to cease or curtail operations. We are vulnerable to damage from various types of disasters, including earthquakes, fires, terrorist acts, floods, power losses, communications failures and similar events. If any such disaster were to occur, we might not be able to operate our business at our facilities, and because our premises require FDA approval, we could experience significant delays before we could manufacture products from a replacement facility. Our Pleasanton facility is located in an area of frequent seismic activity. In addition, our suppliers and customers also have operations in locations vulnerable to various types of disasters. Any insurance we maintain may not be adequate to cover our losses resulting from disasters or other business interruptions and our emergency response plans may not be effective in preventing or minimizing losses in the future. Therefore, any such catastrophe could seriously harm our business and consolidated results of operations. We are subject to taxation in a number of jurisdictions and changes to the corporate tax rate and laws of any of these jurisdictions could increase the amount of corporate taxes we have to pay. We pay taxes principally in the U.S., U.K., Switzerland, Germany and France and these tax jurisdictions have in the past and may in the future make changes to their corporate tax rates and other tax laws, which could increase our future tax obligations. Unanticipated changes in our tax rates could affect our future results of operations. Our future effective tax rates could be unfavorably affected by changes in tax laws or the interpretation of tax laws, by unanticipated decreases in the percentage of revenue or earnings in states with low statutory tax rates, or by changes in the valuation of our deferred tax assets and liabilities. In addition, we are subject to the continual examination of our income tax returns by the Internal Revenue Service, state tax authorities, and other domestic and foreign tax authorities, primarily related to our intercompany transfer pricing. We regularly assess the likelihood of outcomes resulting from these examinations to determine the adequacy of our income tax expense and our reserves for potential adjustments, including tax credits and other tax benefits that can be challenged under audit by various taxing authorities resulting in potential reduction in the amount of credits or other benefits eventually realized. We believe such estimates to be reasonable; however, there can be no assurance that the final determination of any of these examinations will not have an adverse effect on our operating results and financial position. Future levels of research and development spending, capital investment, and export sales may impact our entitlement to related tax credits and benefits, which have the effect of lowering our tax rate. For a more detailed discussion of the additional taxes to which we are subject see "Business Third Party Coverage and Reimbursement." Any claims relating to improper handling, storage or disposal of hazardous chemicals and biomaterials could be time consuming and costly to address. Manufacturing and research and development of our products require the use of hazardous materials, including chemicals and biomaterials. We cannot eliminate the risk of accidental contamination or discharge and any resultant injury from these materials. We could be subject to both criminal liability and civil damages in the event of an improper or unauthorized release of, or exposure of individuals to, hazardous materials. In addition, claimants may sue us for injury or contamination that results from our use or the use by third parties of these materials, and our liability may exceed our total assets. Compliance with environmental laws and regulations is expensive, and current or future environmental regulations may impair our research, development or production efforts or harm our operating results. 33 Table of Contents Anti takeover defenses in our governing documents could prevent an acquisition of our company or limit the price that investors might be willing to pay for our common stock. Our governing documents could make it difficult for another company to acquire control of our company. For example, our Articles of Incorporation allow our Board of Directors to issue, at any time and without shareholder approval, preferred stock with such terms as it may determine. No shares of preferred stock are currently outstanding. However, the rights of holders of any of our preferred stock that may be issued in the future may be superior to the rights of holders of our common stock. This could limit the price that certain potential acquirers would be willing to pay for shares of our common stock and could delay, prevent or allow our Board of Directors to resist an acquisition of our company, even if the proposed transaction was favored by a majority of our independent shareholders. Disruptions of critical information systems or material breaches in the security of our systems could harm our business, customer relations and financial condition. We rely in part on information technology to store information, interface with customers, maintain financial accuracy and accurately produce our financial statements. If our information technology systems do not effectively and securely collect, store, process and report relevant data for the operation of our business, whether due to equipment malfunction or constraints, software deficiencies or human error, our ability to effectively plan, forecast and execute our business plan and comply with applicable laws and regulations will be impaired, perhaps materially. Any such impairment could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and the timeliness with which we report our internal and external operating results. Our business requires us to use and store customer, employee and business partner and, in certain instances patient, personally identifiable information. We are subject to various domestic and international privacy and security regulations, including but not limited to HIPAA. HIPAA mandates, among other things, the adoption of uniform standards for the electronic exchange of information in common healthcare transactions, as well as standards relating to the privacy and security of individually identifiable health information, which require the adoption of administrative, physical and technical safeguards to protect such information. In addition, many states have enacted comparable laws addressing the privacy and security of health information, some of which are more stringent than HIPAA. If we fail to comply with these standards, we could be subject to criminal penalties and civil sanctions. While we devote significant resources to ne2rk security, data encryption and other security measures to protect our systems and data, including our own proprietary information and the confidential and personally identifiable information of our customers, employees, business partners and patients, these security measures cannot provide absolute security. The costs to us to eliminate or alleviate ne2rk security problems, bugs, viruses, worms, malicious software programs and security vulnerabilities could be significant, and our efforts to address these problems may not be successful, resulting potentially in the theft, loss, destruction or corruption of information we store electronically, as well as unexpected interruptions, delays or cessation of service, any of which could cause harm to our business operations. Moreover, if a computer security breach or cyber attack affects our systems or results in the unauthorized release of proprietary or personally identifiable information, our reputation could be materially damaged and our operations could be impaired. We would also be exposed to a risk of loss or litigation and potential liability, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments N1 34 Table of Contents Item 2 Item 2 Properties 
